Utah statutes.
34-23-206.   Permitted occupations for minors 10 or older.

Minors 10 years of age or older may work in occupations such as:

(1)  delivery of handbills, newspapers, advertising, and advertising samples;

(2)  shoe-shining;

(3)  gardening and lawn care involving no power-driven lawn or snow removal equipment;

(4)  caddying; and

(5)  any occupation not determined harmful by the division.



Amended by Chapter 240, 1996 General Session

